District of Columbia statutes.
3-1203.01

Administration.

The boards established by this chapter shall be under the administrative control of the Mayor.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 301, 33 DCR 729

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-3303.1.